Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.19
Commercial hazardous waste management facility; approval; director; duties.

Following approval action by the local governing body, the director shall determine if the proposed facility complies with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Act and all rules, regulations, and standards promulgated pursuant to such act. The review shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of factors related to air quality, water quality, waste management, and hydrogeology and of the environmental risks and benefits to the vicinity in which the facility would be located. Each person in the department who reviews the application shall prepare and sign a written statement for evaluation by the director who shall decide whether to approve or disapprove the application.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 13.